North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.7 Lodging Gross Receipts Tax [Expired]

[Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 13]

57-39.7-01.
Imposition — Exemptions. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 13

57-39.7-02.
Administration. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 13

57-39.7-03.
Allocation of revenue. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 13